Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Subchapter 1. Volunteer Fire Departments Generally

§ 2921.
Powers and duties of official in charge.

In towns that do not maintain a firefighting force and are served by a volunteer fire department, the official in charge of such volunteer fire department or in his or her absence the assistant highest in rank present at a fire shall have the powers and duties of a chief engineer provided in section 2673 of this title.

§ 2922.
Liability of official or member.

An official of a volunteer fire department shall not be liable for any act or omission on his or her own part, or on the part of any member of such department, while engaged in extinguishing a fire at or near the scene of such fire, nor shall any member of such department be liable for his or her own act or omission if then acting under orders of his or her superior.